Illinois, session 104th, SB1743.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act is 5amended by changing Section 4.3 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 15/4.3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 4.3. Written collaborative agreements. 9    (a) A written collaborative agreement is required for all 10prescribing psychologists practicing under a prescribing 11psychologist license issued pursuant to Section 4.2 of this 12Act.13    (b) A written delegation of prescriptive authority by a 14collaborating physician may only include medications for the 15treatment of mental health disease or illness the 16collaborating physician generally provides to his or her 17patients in the normal course of his or her clinical practice 18with the exception of the following:19        (1) patients who are less than 17 years of age or over 20    65 years of age;21        (2) patients during pregnancy;22        (3) patients with serious medical conditions, such as 23    heart disease, cancer, stroke, or seizures, and with   SB1743 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11917 AAS 22009 b1    developmental disabilities and intellectual disabilities; 2    and3        (4) prescriptive authority for benzodiazepine Schedule 4    III controlled substances.5    (c) The collaborating physician shall file with the 6Department notice of delegation of prescriptive authority and 7termination of the delegation, in accordance with rules of the 8Department. Upon receipt of this notice delegating authority 9to prescribe any nonnarcotic Schedule III through V controlled 10substances, the licensed clinical psychologist shall be 11eligible to register for a mid-level practitioner controlled 12substance license under Section 303.05 of the Illinois 13Controlled Substances Act.14    (d) All of the following shall apply to delegation of 15prescriptive authority:16        (1) Any delegation of Schedule III through V 17    controlled substances shall identify the specific 18    controlled substance by brand name or generic name. No 19    controlled substance to be delivered by injection may be 20    delegated. No Schedule II controlled substance shall be 21    delegated. 22        (2) A prescribing psychologist shall not prescribe 23    narcotic drugs, as defined in Section 102 of the Illinois 24    Controlled Substances Act.25    Any prescribing psychologist who writes a prescription for 26a controlled substance without having valid and appropriate   SB1743 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11917 AAS 22009 b1authority may be fined by the Department not more than $50 per 2prescription and the Department may take any other 3disciplinary action provided for in this Act.4    All prescriptions written by a prescribing psychologist 5must contain the name of the prescribing psychologist and his 6or her signature. The prescribing psychologist shall sign his 7or her own name. 8    (e) The written collaborative agreement shall describe the 9working relationship of the prescribing psychologist with the 10collaborating physician and shall delegate prescriptive 11authority as provided in this Act. Collaboration does not 12require an employment relationship between the collaborating 13physician and prescribing psychologist. Absent an employment 14relationship, an agreement may not restrict third-party 15payment sources accepted by the prescribing psychologist. For 16the purposes of this Section, "collaboration" means the 17relationship between a prescribing psychologist and a 18collaborating physician with respect to the delivery of 19prescribing services in accordance with (1) the prescribing 20psychologist's training, education, and experience and (2) 21collaboration and consultation as documented in a jointly 22developed written collaborative agreement.23    (f) The agreement shall promote the exercise of 24professional judgment by the prescribing psychologist 25corresponding to his or her education and experience.26    (g) The collaborative agreement shall not be construed to   SB1743 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11917 AAS 22009 b1require the personal presence of a physician at the place 2where services are rendered. Methods of communication shall be 3available for consultation with the collaborating physician in 4person or by telecommunications in accordance with established 5written guidelines as set forth in the written agreement.6    (h) Collaboration and consultation pursuant to all 7collaboration agreements shall be adequate if a collaborating 8physician does each of the following:9        (1) participates in the joint formulation and joint 10    approval of orders or guidelines with the prescribing 11    psychologist and he or she periodically reviews the 12    prescribing psychologist's orders and the services 13    provided patients under the orders in accordance with 14    accepted standards of medical practice and prescribing 15    psychologist practice;16        (2) provides collaboration and consultation with the 17    prescribing psychologist in person at least once a month 18    for review of safety and quality clinical care or 19    treatment;20        (3) is available through telecommunications for 21    consultation on medical problems, complications, 22    emergencies, or patient referral; and23        (4) reviews medication orders of the prescribing 24    psychologist no less than monthly, including review of 25    laboratory tests and other tests as available.26    (i) The written collaborative agreement shall contain   SB1743 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11917 AAS 22009 b1provisions detailing notice for termination or change of 2status involving a written collaborative agreement, except 3when the notice is given for just cause.4    (j) A copy of the signed written collaborative agreement 5shall be available to the Department upon request to either 6the prescribing psychologist or the collaborating physician.7    (k) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 8the authority of a prescribing psychologist to perform all 9duties authorized under this Act.10    (l) A prescribing psychologist shall inform each 11collaborating physician of all collaborative agreements he or 12she has signed and provide a copy of these to any collaborating 13physician.14    (m) No collaborating physician shall enter into more than 153 collaborative agreements with prescribing psychologists.16(Source: P.A. 101-84, eff. 7-19-19.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.